Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-247
Department of Correctional Services; sell described property.

The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to sell and convey by quitclaim deed two tracts of land located in the southeast quarter of section two, township nine north, range six, east of the sixth principal meridian, Lancaster County, Nebraska, more particularly described as follows:

(1) Referring to the east one-quarter corner of said section two; thence southerly along the east line of the southeast quarter of said section two on an assumed bearing of south zero degrees, zero minutes, zero seconds east a distance of sixty-six and no tenths feet; thence south eighty-nine degrees, fifty-six minutes, ten seconds west along the southerly thirty-three and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of Calvert Street as platted in the city of Lincoln a distance of five hundred forty-two and fifty-five hundredths feet to the point of beginning; thence south two degrees, fifty-seven minutes, twelve seconds west along the west line of relocated Thirteenth Street a distance of five hundred eighty-two and thirty-two hundredths feet to the point of curvature of a nine hundred thirteen and fifty-one hundredths-foot radius curve to the left; thence in a southwesterly direction along said nine hundred thirteen and fifty-one hundredths-foot radius curve to the left having a chord bearing of south sixteen degrees, twenty-three minutes, two seconds east and a chord distance of five hundred fifteen and thirty-five hundredths feet to the point of tangency of said curve; thence south thirty degrees, thirty-five minutes, nine seconds east a distance of three hundred ninety-three and ninety-one hundredths feet; thence south forty-six degrees, ten minutes, forty-two seconds west a distance of fifty-eight and thirty-four hundredths feet to a point on a five thousand thirty-two and seventy-four hundredths-foot radius curve to the right, said point being on the northeasterly one hundred fifteen and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of Nebraska State Highway No. 2; thence in a northwesterly direction along said five thousand thirty-two and seventy-four hundredths-foot radius curve to the right having a chord bearing of north forty degrees, seventeen minutes, thirty-two seconds west and a chord distance of five hundred eighty-one and thirty-eight hundredths feet to the point of tangency of said curve; thence north fifty-four degrees, fifty-eight minutes, thirty-nine seconds west a distance of one hundred forty and no tenths feet; thence north thirty degrees, fifty-eight minutes, seven seconds west a distance of three hundred thirteen and eighty-two hundredths feet to the point of curvature of a two thousand twenty-two and twenty-two hundredths-foot radius curve to the right; thence in a northwesterly direction along said two thousand twenty-two and twenty-two hundredths-foot radius curve to the right having a chord bearing of north twenty-seven degrees, five minutes, eleven seconds west and a chord distance of three hundred forty-one and ninety hundredths feet to the point of tangency of said curve; thence north fourteen degrees, thirty-nine minutes, fifty-seven seconds west a distance of three hundred sixty-nine and fifty-two hundredths feet to a point on the southerly thirty-three and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of Calvert Street; thence north eighty-nine degrees, fifty-six minutes, ten seconds east along the southerly thirty-three and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of Calvert Street a distance of six hundred twenty-seven and sixty-three hundredths feet to the point of beginning; containing an area of eleven and twenty-eight hundredths acres, more or less; and

(2) Referring to the southeast corner of said section 2; thence in a northerly direction along the east line of the southeast quarter of said section two on an assumed bearing of north zero degrees, zero minutes, zero seconds east a distance of one thousand three hundred seventy-six and seventy hundredths feet; thence north ninety degrees, zero minutes, zero seconds west perpendicular to the last-described course a distance of thirty-three and no tenths feet to a point on the westerly thirty-three and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of Fourteenth Street as platted in the city of Lincoln and the point of beginning; thence south fifty-nine degrees, fifty-five minutes, thirty-five seconds west a distance of seventy-nine and seventy-four hundredths feet to a point on the northeasterly eighty-five and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of relocated Thirteenth Street; thence north thirty-three degrees, thirteen minutes, nine seconds west a distance of three hundred seventy-six and one hundredths feet; thence north twenty-three degrees, four minutes, fifty-seven seconds west a distance of one hundred eighty and sixty-eight hundredths feet; thence north twelve degrees, fifteen minutes, twenty-one seconds west a distance of one hundred fifty-five and two hundredths feet to a point on the southerly thirty and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of Stockwell Street; thence south eighty-nine degrees, one minute, forty seconds east along the southerly thirty and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of Stockwell Street a distance of three hundred seventy-eight and eighty-hundredths feet to a point on the westerly thirty-three and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of said Fourteenth Street; thence south zero degrees, zero minutes, zero seconds east along the westerly thirty-three and no tenths-foot right-of-way line of said Fourteenth Street a distance of five hundred eighty-five and eighty-eight hundredths feet to the point of beginning; containing an area of three and sixty-three hundredths acres, more or less.

Laws 1987, LB 526, § 1.